Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1028
Esthetics salon, defined.

Esthetics salon means a fixed structure or part thereof licensed under the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act to serve as the site for the performance of any or all of the practices of esthetics by persons licensed under such act.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 28;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 71-367;

Laws 2002, LB 241, § 11;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-357.03;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 290;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 8.